Maine, session 132, LD500.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §2602-A, sub-§3, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 483, Pt. BB, §2, is
repealed and the following enacted in its place:
3. Private residential water testing for low-income residents. The department shall
establish and maintain programs to provide free testing for contaminants of the private
residential water supplies of low-income residents. As used in this subsection, "low-income
resident" means a person who receives assistance under the MaineCare program or the food
supplement program under section 3104.
A. The programs must include:
(1) A program through the Health and Environmental Testing Laboratory
established in section 565 to provide testing for arsenic and other contaminants
specified in section 2660-T; and
(2) A program to provide testing for perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl
substances, as defined in Title 38, section 1614, subsection 1, paragraph F, through
contracts with qualified laboratories. The testing must be based on the most
recently available analytical method approved by the federal Environmental
Protection Agency that quantifies the maximum levels of perfluoroalkyl and
polyfluoroalkyl substances.
B. The department may not charge any fee or recover any cost as otherwise permitted
by this chapter for a test of a private residential water supply performed for a low-
income resident under the programs established pursuant to this subsection. The
department shall use funds from the Health and Environmental Testing Laboratory
dedicated account to pay program costs under paragraph A.
C. The department shall conduct educational outreach to increase awareness among
low-income residents with private residential water supplies of:
(1) The availability of free well water testing under this subsection; and
(2) The availability of grants under Title 30-A, section 4722, paragraph FF to pay
for drinking water treatment systems to reduce exposure to contaminants.
Outreach under this subparagraph must be conducted in consultation with the
Maine State Housing Authority.
Sec. 2. 30-A MRSA §4722, sub-§1, ¶FF, as amended by PL 2021, c. 322, §1, is
further amended to read:
FF. Provide grants to eligible homeowners who are served by private well water that
shows evidence of high levels of arsenic contamination a contaminant described in
Title 22, section 2660-T in an amount that exceeds state standards. For purposes of
this paragraph, "homeowner" includes an individual who occupies a single-family
dwelling that is located on land that is owned by a member of that individual's
immediate family and "immediate family" means a spouse, parent, child, sibling,
stepchild, stepparent and grandparent;
Page 1 - 132LR0886(01)